Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4510
Policy, defined.

Policy shall mean any individual or group policy, contract, subscriber agreement, rider, or endorsement delivered or issued for delivery in this state by an insurer, fraternal benefit society, prepaid health plan, health maintenance organization, or any similar organization.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 272.